Connecticut, session 2026, HB05435.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 29-38c of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 29-36k, the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection holding
any firearm or firearms or other deadly weapon or deadly weapons and
any ammunition seized pursuant to a warrant issued under this section,
or any local police department holding on behalf of said commissioner
any such firearm or firearms or other deadly weapon or deadly weapons
or ammunition, shall not destroy any such firearm or other deadly
weapon or ammunition until [at least one year has passed since date of
the termination of a warrant under subsection (e) of this section] two
years have passed since the person named in an order or a warrant last
petitioned the court to terminate the order or warrant under subsection
(f) of this section. If, after such two-year period, such firearm or firearms
LCO No. 2216 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5435
or other deadly weapon or deadly weapons or ammunition have not
been transferred pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, the
commissioner or local police department, as applicable, shall cause such
firearm or firearms or other deadly weapon or deadly weapons or
ammunition to be destroyed.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-38c(i)